Colorado statutes. TITLE 1 Elections
ARTICLE 41
ODD-NUMBERED YEAR ELECTIONS

Section

1-41-101. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly hereby finds, determines, and declares that section 20 of article X of the state constitution requires that a ballot issue election be held on the first Tuesday in November of odd-numbered years; that the provisions of section 20 (2) and 20 (3) of said article X are unclear as to what issues can be submitted to a vote in the odd-year election; that section 20 of article X did not amend preexisting provisions of the state constitution on the initiative, the referendum, and the submission of constitutional amendments by the general assembly, and repeal or amendment of such provisions by implication is not presumed; that this legislation implements section 20 of article X of the state constitution, which article is entitled "Revenue" and concerns exclusively government revenue raising and appropriations; that section 20 of article X requires public votes on additional government taxes, spending, or debt; that the language of section 20 of article X evinces the public's desire to have more opportunity to vote on government tax, spending, and debt proposals; that a construction of section 20 of article X that limits local government electors' opportunities to vote on tax, spending, debt, or other proposals would be inconsistent with the ballot title of and the voters' intention in adopting said amendment; that state and local election officials need guidance as to how to administer the November 1993 election; and that, in view of the issues set out in this section, the general assembly should exercise its legislative power to resolve the ambiguities in section 20 of article X in a manner consistent with its terms.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article added, p. 1993, § 1, effective June 8.

1-41-102. State ballot issue elections in odd-numbered years.

At the statewide election to be held on the first Tuesday of November in 1993, and in each odd-numbered year thereafter, the following issues shall appear on the ballot if they concern state matters arising under section 20 of article X of the state constitution and if they are submitted in accordance with applicable law:

Amendments to the state constitution submitted by the general assembly in accordance with article XIX of the state constitution;

State legislation and amendments to the state constitution initiated in accordance with section 1 of article V of the state constitution and article 40 of this title;

Measures referred to the people by the general assembly in accordance with section 1 of article V of the state constitution;

Measures referred to the people pursuant to petitions filed against an act or item, section, or part of an act of the general assembly in accordance with section 1 of article V of the state constitution;

Questions which are referred to the people by the general assembly in accordance with the law prescribing procedures therefor;

Questions which are initiated by the people in accordance with the law prescribing procedures therefor.

If no questions concerning state matters arising under section 20 of article X of the state constitution are referred or initiated as provided in subsection (1) of this section, no statewide election shall be held on the first Tuesday of November in 1993, or on the first Tuesday in November of any subsequent odd-numbered year.

As used in this section, a "question" means a proposition which is in the form of a question meeting the requirements of section 20 (3)(c) of article X of the state constitution and which is submitted in accordance with the law prescribing procedures therefor without reference to specific state legislation or a specific amendment to the state constitution.

As used in this section, "state matters arising under section 20 of article X of the state constitution" includes:

Approval of a new tax, tax rate increase, valuation for assessment ratio increase for a property class, or extension of an expiring tax, or a tax policy change directly causing a net tax revenue gain pursuant to section 20 (4)(a) of article X of the state constitution;

Approval of the creation of any multiple-fiscal year direct or indirect state debt or other financial obligation without adequate present cash reserves pledged irrevocably and held for payments in all future fiscal years pursuant to section 20 (4)(b) of article X of the state constitution;

Approval of emergency taxes pursuant to section 20 (6) of article X of the state constitution;

Approval of revenue changes pursuant to section 20 (7) of article X of the state constitution;

Approval of a delay in voting on ballot issues pursuant to section 20 (3)(a) of article X of the state constitution;

Approval of the weakening of a state limit on revenue, spending, and debt pursuant to section 20 (1) of article X of the state constitution; and

Approval for the state to retain and spend state revenues that otherwise would be refunded for exceeding an estimate included in the ballot information booklet in accordance with section 20 (3)(c) of article X of the state constitution.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article added, p. 1994, § 1, effective June 8.

L. 2015:

(4)(f) amended and (4)(g) added, (HB 15-1367), ch. 271, p. 1073, § 9, effective June 4.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 15-1367, see section 1 of chapter 271, Session Laws of Colorado 2015.

1-41-103. Local ballot issue elections in odd-numbered years.

At the local election to be held on the first Tuesday of November in 1993, and in each odd-numbered year thereafter, the following issues shall appear on the ballot if they concern local government matters arising under section 20 of article X of the state constitution and if they are submitted in accordance with applicable law:

Amendments to the charter of any home rule city or home rule county initiated by the voters or submitted by the legislative body of the home rule city or county in accordance with said charter;

Ordinances, resolutions, or franchises proposed in accordance with section 1 of article V of the state constitution and section 31-11-104, C.R.S.;

Measures referred to the people pursuant to petitions filed against an ordinance, resolution, or franchise passed by the legislative body of any local government in accordance with section 1 of article V of the state constitution and section 31-11-105, C.R.S.;

Questions which are referred to the people by the governing body of the local government in accordance with the law prescribing procedures therefor;

Questions which are initiated by the people in accordance with the law prescribing procedures therefor.

As used in this section, "local government" means a county, a municipality as defined in section 31-1-101 (6), C.R.S., a school district, or a special district as defined in sections 32-1-103 (20) and 35-70-109, C.R.S.

As used in this section, a "question" means a proposition which is in the form of a question meeting the requirements of section 20 (3)(c) of article X of the state constitution and which is submitted in accordance with the law prescribing procedures therefor without reference to a specific ordinance, resolution, franchise, or other local legislation or a specific amendment to the charter of a home rule city or home rule county.

As used in this section, "local government matters arising under section 20 of article X of the state constitution" includes:

Approval of a new tax, tax rate increase, mill levy above that for the prior year, or extension of an expiring tax, or a tax policy change directly causing a net tax revenue gain pursuant to section 20 (4)(a) of article X of the state constitution;

Approval of the creation of any multiple-fiscal year direct or indirect debt or other financial obligation without adequate present cash reserves pledged irrevocably and held for payments in all future fiscal years pursuant to section 20 (4)(b) of article X of the state constitution;

Approval of emergency taxes pursuant to section 20 (6) of article X of the state constitution;

Approval of revenue changes pursuant to section 20 (7) of article X of the state constitution;

Approval of a delay in voting on ballot issues pursuant to section 20 (3)(a) of article X of the state constitution;

Approval of the weakening of a local limit on revenue, spending, and debt pursuant to section 20 (1) of article X of the state constitution.

The submission of issues at elections in November of odd-numbered years in accordance with this section, or at other elections as provided in section 20 (3)(a) of article X of the state constitution, shall not be deemed the exclusive method of submitting local issues to a vote of the people, and nothing in this section shall be construed to repeal, diminish, or otherwise affect in any way the authority of local governments to hold issue elections in accordance with other provisions of law.

and (7) Repealed.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article added, p. 1995, § 1, effective June 8.

L. 94:

(1)(b) and (1)(c) amended, p. 1622, § 6, effective May 31.

L. 95:

(1)(b) and (1)(c) amended, p. 439, § 24, effective May 8.

L. 2001:

(6) and (7) added, p. 273, § 31, effective March 30.

L. 2010:

(6) and (7) repealed, (HB 10-1116), ch. 194, p. 840, § 29, effective May 5.